Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2319
Charging spouse with gifts received; liability of others for balance of elective share.

(a) In the proceeding for an elective share, property which is part of the augmented estate which passes or has passed to the surviving spouse by testate or intestate succession or other means and which has not been renounced, including that described in section 30-2314, is applied first to satisfy the elective share and to reduce the amount due from other recipients of portions of the augmented estate.

(b) Remaining property of the augmented estate is so applied that liability for the balance of the elective share of the surviving spouse is equitably apportioned among the recipients of the augmented estate in proportion to the value of their interests therein.

(c) Only original transferees from, or appointees of, the decedent and their donees, to the extent the donees have the property or its proceeds, are subject to the contribution to make up the elective share of the surviving spouse. A person liable to contribution may choose to give up the property transferred to him or to pay its value as of the time it is considered in computing the augmented estate.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 41, UPC § 2-207.

A surviving spouse's beneficial interest in an inter vivos trust created by the decedent is property which passes or has passed to the surviving spouse within the meaning of this section such that it should be charged against the amount of the surviving spouse's elective share of the augmented estate. In re Estate of Myers, 256 Neb. 817, 594 N.W.2d 563 (1999).

This section does not make a distinction between specific and residuary beneficiaries; each beneficiary, regardless of whether it is a specific or residual beneficiary, must contribute proportionately, according to its interests, to the elective share. In re Estate of Ziegenbein, 2 Neb. App. 923, 519 N.W.2d 5 (1994).